apertium-en-es.en.metadix
    <pardef n="dilettant/e__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -e and add -i or -es (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kibbutz__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which add -im">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="librett/o__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -o and add -i or -os (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" a="greenbreen">
        <p>
          <l>os'</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lir/a__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -a and add -e">
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pen/ny__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -ny and add -ce or -nies (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>ny</l>
          <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nies</l>
          <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="phalan/x__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -x and add -ges or -xes (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>x</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ges</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>xes</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="corp/us__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -us and add -ora or -uses (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ora</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>uses</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="archipelago__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which  add -s or -es (LR)">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="calcul/us__n">
      <e a="greenbreen">
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e a="greenbreen">
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" a="greenbreen">
        <p>
          <l>uses</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" a="greenbreen">
        <p>
          <l>uses'</l>
           <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cact/us__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -us and add -i or -es (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>uses</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zebra__n">
      <e c="CP: singular spelling">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e c="CP: plural spelling: add -s">
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="CP: alternative plural spelling (not very common): invariable singular form">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BBC__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cent/re__n">
      <e c="CP: en_US/en_GB dialect variation" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>re</r>
        </p>
        <par n="house__n"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <i>re</i>
        <par n="house__n"/>
      </e>
      <e alt="en_US" r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>re</r>
        </p>
        <par n="house__n"/>
      </e>
      <e alt="en_GB" r="RL">
        <i>re</i>
        <par n="house__n"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="col/our__n">
      <e c="CP: en_US/en_GB dialect variation" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>or</l>
          <r>our</r>
        </p>
        <par n="house__n"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <i>our</i>
        <par n="house__n"/>
      </e>
      <e alt="en_US" r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>or</l>
          <r>our</r>
        </p>
        <par n="house__n"/>
      </e>
      <e alt="en_GB" r="RL">
        <i>our</i>
        <par n="house__n"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="globali/sation__n">
      <e c="CP: en_US/en_GB dialect variation" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>zation</l>
          <r>sation</r>
        </p>
        <par n="house__n"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <i>sation</i>
        <par n="house__n"/>
      </e>
      <e alt="en_US" r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>zation</l>
          <r>sation</r>
        </p>
        <par n="house__n"/>
      </e>
      <e alt="en_GB" r="RL">
        <i>sation</i>
        <par n="house__n"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Barcelona__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mars__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="United_States__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mark__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="James__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mary__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Seychelles"><i>Seychelles</i><par n="Mars__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="Concello de Ogrove" a="eleka"><i>Concello<b/>de<b/>Ogrove</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Nahim"><i>Nahim</i><par n="Mary__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Flo"><i>Flo</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Amir"><i>Amir</i><par n="Mark__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Democritus"><i>Democritus</i><par n="James__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Leonardo"><i>Leonardo</i><par n="Mark__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Makenzie"><i>Makenzie</i><par n="Mary__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Bolivia"><i>Bolivia</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Magdalen Islands"><i>Magdalen<b/>Islands</i><par n="United_States__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Damascus"><i>Damascus</i><par n="Mars__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Dennis"><i>Dennis</i><par n="James__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="United States"><i>United<b/>States</i><par n="United_States__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="concerto" a="carmentano"><i>concert</i><par n="librett/o__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="consensus"><i>consens</i><par n="corp/us__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="epicentre"><i>epicent</i><par n="cent/re__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="flavour"><i>flav</i><par n="col/our__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="focus"><i>foc</i><par n="cact/us__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="individualisation"><i>individuali</i><par n="globali/sation__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="litre"><i>lit</i><par n="cent/re__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="millilitre"><i>millilit</i><par n="cent/re__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="neighbour" c="UE"><i>neighb</i><par n="col/our__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="nucleus" a="carmentano"><i>nucle</i><par n="cact/us__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="partridge"><i>partridge</i><par n="zebra__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="phosphorus"><i>phosphor</i><par n="corp/us__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="seed"><i>seed</i><par n="zebra__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="tobacco"><i>tobacco</i><par n="archipelago__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="utilisation"><i>utili</i><par n="globali/sation__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="watercolour"><i>watercol</i><par n="col/our__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="zebra"><i>zebra</i><par n="zebra__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="CD" a="carmentano"><i>CD</i><par n="BBC__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="NATO" a="doriua"><i>NATO</i><par n="BBC__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Clement IX"><i>Clement<b/>IX</i><par n="Mark__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="Bretton Woods"><i>Bretton<b/>Woods</i><par n="Mars__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="Kuwait"><i>Kuwait</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="Seychelles"><i>Seychelles</i><par n="Mars__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="cul-de-sac"><i>cul-de-sac</i><par n="zebra__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="dioptre"><i>diopt</i><par n="cent/re__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="fiasco"><i>fiasco</i><par n="archipelago__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="hippocampus"><i>hippocamp</i><par n="corp/us__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="humerus"><i>humer</i><par n="corp/us__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="ionization"><i>ioni</i><par n="globali/sation__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="penny"><i>pen</i><par n="pen/ny__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="placebo"><i>placebo</i><par n="archipelago__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="ice cream parlour"><i>ice<b/>cream<b/>parl</i><par n="col/our__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cactus" a="greenbreen"><i>cact</i><par n="cact/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fertilization" a="greenbreen"><i>fertili</i><par n="globali/sation__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ISO" a="greenbreen"><i>ISO</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Hipparchus" a="greenbreen"><i>Hipparchus</i><par n="James__np"/></e>
    <e lm="tempo" a="greenbreen"><i>temp</i><par n="librett/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tensor calculus" a="greenbreen"><i>tensor<b/>calcul</i><par n="calcul/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="calculus" a="greenbreen"><i>calcul</i><par n="calcul/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Naples" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>Naples</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
    <e lm="grotto" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>grotto</i><par n="archipelago__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Misrata" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>Misrata</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
    <e lm="RAF" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>RAF</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eucalyptus"><i>eucalypt</i><par n="calcul/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prospectus"><i>prospectus</i><par n="calcul/us__n"/></e>
